California, session 20252026, AB675.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 49030) is added to Division 17 of the Food and Agricultural Code, to read:15.California Farm to School Act49030.SECTION 1. Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 49025) is added to Division 17 of the Food and Agricultural Code, to read: CHAPTER 14.5. California Farm to School Act49025. This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Farm to School Act.49031.49025.1. (a) The California Farm to School Program is hereby established, under the administration of the Office of Farm to Fork, for purposes of cultivating equity, nurturing students, building climate resilience, and creating scalable and sustainable change in the school food system.(b) The California Farm to School Program shall increase procurement of foods that are grown or produced in California and are whole or minimally processed from food producers in California for school meal programs and increase hands-on food education opportunities that engage pupils and connect the classroom with the cafeteria, such as activities in school gardens, on farms, in culinary classes, in settings that celebrate traditional foodways and cultivate food sovereignty, and through other experiential learning pathways.(c) To the extent that funding is available, the office may implement initiatives under the California Farm to School Program, including, but not limited to, initiatives that do all of the following:(1) Advance the California farm to school network.(2) Provide resources and facilitate relationships between local producers and school personnel and encourage opportunities to incorporate best practices such as scratch cooking, hands-on education, Good Agricultural Practices (GAP), climate-smart agricultural practices, certification, and insurance.(3) Increase the nutritional profile of foods provided in schools.(4) Facilitate a California Farm to School Interagency Working Group.(d) The office shall administer the California Farm to School Incubator Grant Program under the California Farm to School Program.(e) The office shall develop the programming for the California Farm to School Program in consultation with the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services.49032.49025.2. The department may adopt regulations necessary to implement and administer the California Farm to School Program.49033.49025.3. The Farm to School Account is hereby created in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. The account shall consist of funds from federal, state, industry, philanthropic, and private sources. Moneys in the account shall be available to the department upon appropriation by the Legislature for purposes of the program. California Farm to School Program.